Utah statutes.
62A-5-309.   Commitment -- Person 18 years or older.

Beginning July 1, 1993, the director or his designee may commit to the division an individual 18 years of age or older who has an intellectual disability, for observation, diagnosis, care, and treatment if that commitment is based on:

(1)  involuntary commitment under the provisions of Section 62A-5-312; or

(2)  temporary emergency commitment under the provisions of Section 62A-5-311.

